test/src/morphology/pronouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Pronoun - goabbák: # Indef
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: goabbák
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: goappága
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: goappágav
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: goappágin
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: goappágij
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: goappágis
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: goappágijn
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: goappága
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: goappágij
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: goappágijt
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: goappágijn
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: goappágijda
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: goappágijs
    goabbák+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: goappágij

  Pronoun - gájkka: # Indefinitive
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: gájkka
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: gájka
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: gájkav
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: gájkan
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: gájkkaj
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: gájkas
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: gájkajn
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: gájka
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: gájkaj
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: gájkajt
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: gájkajn
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: gájkajda
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: gájkajs
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: gájkaj
    gájka+Pron+Indef+Ess: gájkkan

  Pronoun - mige: # Indefinitive
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: mige
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: maŋga
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: mavga
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: mannak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: masik
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: masstak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: majnak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: mahkka
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: majgak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: majdik
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: majnak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: []
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: majstak
    mige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: majga
    mige+Pron+Indef+Ess: mannak

  Pronoun - nágin: # Indefinitive
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: nágin
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: nágina
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: náginav
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: náginin
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: náginis
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: náginijn
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: nágina
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: náginijt
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: náginijn
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: náginijda
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: náginijs
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: náginij
    nágin+Pron+Indef+Ess: náginin

  Pronoun - aktak: # Indefinitive
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: aktak
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: avtak
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: avtak
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: avtanik
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: aktasik
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: avtastik
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: avtajnik
    aktak+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: []

  Pronoun - færtguhtik: # Indefinitive
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: færtguhtik
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: færtgeŋga
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: færtgevga
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: færtgænnanik
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: færtgesik
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: færtgæstástik
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: færtgejnak
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: færtgudik
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: færtgejga
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: færtgejdak
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: færtgejnak
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: færtgejdak
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: færtgejstak
    færtguhtik+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: færtgejga

  Pronoun - juoga: # Indefinitive
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juoga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: juoŋga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: juojddáv
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: juonná
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: juosik
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: juosstá
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: juojnak
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: juojddájt
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: []
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Ess: juonen

  Pronoun - ållusa: # Indefinitive
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: []
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: ållusa
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: ållusij
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: ållusijt
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: ållusijn
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: ållusijda
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: ållusijs
    ållusa+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: ållusij

  Pronoun - soames: # Indefinitive
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: soames
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: soabmása
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: soabmásav
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: soabmásin
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: soabmásij
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: soabmásis
    soames+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: soabmásijn
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: soabmása
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: soabmásij
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: soabmásijt
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: soabmásijn
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: soabmásijda
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: soabmásijs
    soames+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: soabmásij

  Pronoun - ietjá: # Indefinitive
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: ietjá
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: ietjá
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: ietjáv
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: ietján
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: ietjáj
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: ietjás
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: ietjájn
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: iehtjáda
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: iehtjádij
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: iehtjádijt
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: iehtjádijn
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: iehtjádijda
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: iehtjádijs
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: iehtjádij
    ietjá+Pron+Indef+Ess: ietján

  Pronoun - divna: # Indefinitive
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: divnna
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: []
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: divnav
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: []
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: []
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: []
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: []
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: divna
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: divnaj
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: divnajt
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: divnajn
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: divnajda
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: divnajs
    divnna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: divnaj

  Pronoun - ienemus: # Indefinitive
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: ienemus
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: ienemusá
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: ienemusáv
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: ienemusán
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: ienemussaj
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: ienemusás
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: ienemusájn
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: ienemusá
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: ienemusáj
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: ienemusájt
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: ienemusájn
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: ienemusájda
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: ienemusájs
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: ienemusáj
    ienemus+Pron+Indef+Ess: ienemussan

  Pronoun - juobbá: # Indefinitive
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: juoppáv
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: juoppán
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: juobbáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: juoppás
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: juoppájn
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: juoppájt
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: juoppájn
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: juoppájda
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: juoppájs
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Ess: juobbán
